test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-22vwrokwnw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - võrokõnõ: # Noun (22) võrokõnõ 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     võrokõnõ+N+Sg+Nom: võrokõnõ
     võrokõnõ+N+Sg+Gen: võrokõsõ
     võrokõnõ+N+Sg+Par: võrokõist
     võrokõnõ+N+Sg+Ill: võrokõistõ
     võrokõnõ+N+Sg+Ine: võrokõsõn
     võrokõnõ+N+Sg+Ela: võrokõsõst
     võrokõnõ+N+Sg+All: võrokõsõlõ
     võrokõnõ+N+Sg+Ade: võrokõsõl
     võrokõnõ+N+Sg+Abl: võrokõsõlt
     võrokõnõ+N+Sg+Tra: võrokõsõs
     võrokõnõ+N+Sg+Ter: võrokõsõniq
     võrokõnõ+N+Sg+Abe: võrokõsõldaq
     võrokõnõ+N+Sg+Com: võrokõsõgaq
     võrokõnõ+N+Pl+Nom: võrokõsõq
     võrokõnõ+N+Pl+Gen: võrokõisi
     võrokõnõ+N+Pl+Par: võrokõisi
     võrokõnõ+N+Pl+Ill: võrokõisihe
     võrokõnõ+N+Pl+Ine: võrokõisin
     võrokõnõ+N+Pl+Ela: võrokõisist
     võrokõnõ+N+Pl+All: võrokõisilõ
     võrokõnõ+N+Pl+Ade: võrokõisil
     võrokõnõ+N+Pl+Abl: võrokõisilt
     võrokõnõ+N+Pl+Tra: võrokõisis
     võrokõnõ+N+Pl+Ter: võrokõisiniq
     võrokõnõ+N+Pl+Abe: võrokõisildaq
     võrokõnõ+N+Pl+Com: võrokõisigaq
